Massachusetts, session 194th, H2838.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the words "Cushing Hospital", the following words: -
"Highway and Street Construction and Maintenance Workers of the Massachusetts Department
of Transportation."
of 1